Hawaii statutes.
§88-142 Right of amendment or repeal
reserved; retroactive effect. The provisions of sections 88-131 to 88-142
shall not be deemed to constitute a contract with any service member and the
legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal the sections at any time as
to any benefit or allowance not accrued prior to the time of the amendment or
repeal.

The sections shall apply retroactively, as well
as prospectively, to all persons entitled to the benefits of the Servicemen's
Act. [L 1951, c 262, pt of §3; RL 1955, §6-121; HRS §88-132; am L 1969, c 110,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next